Louisiana, session 2026, HB1008.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Part XV of Chapter 26 of Title 17 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of
1950, comprised of R.S. 17:3399.51, is hereby enacted to read as follows:
PART XV. FACULTY MEMBERS: FREEDOM FROM RETALIATION,
ACADEMIC FREEDOM, AND FREE SPEECH
§3399.51. Faculty members; freedom from retaliation for disclosing alleged
violations, academic freedom, and free speech
A. For the purposes of this Part:
Page 1 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1749 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 1008
(1) "Academic freedom" means the right of faculty members to teach,
research, publish, and express views on matters within their field of expertise without
interference, consistent with professional standards and institutional policies.
(2) "Faculty member" means any tenured or nontenured professor, instructor,
lecturer, or other academic employee at a public postsecondary education institution.
(3) "Free speech" means expression protected under the First Amendment
of the Constitution of the United States of America, as interpreted by the United
States Supreme Court, and Article I, Section 7 of the Constitution of Louisiana.
(4) "Public postsecondary education institution" or "institution" means an
institution under the supervision and management of the Board of Supervisors of
Louisiana State University and Agricultural and Mechanical College, the Board of
Supervisors of Southern University and Agricultural and Mechanical College, the
Board of Supervisors for the University of Louisiana System, or the Board of
Supervisors of Community and Technical Colleges.
(5) "Retaliate against or harm" means to inflict any adverse action, such as
discharge, demotion, suspension, denial of promotion or tenure, reduction in pay or
benefits, harassment, threats, negative evaluations, reassignment, or any action
causing financial, professional, or emotional harm.
B.(1) No public postsecondary education institution or any officer,
employee, or agent thereof shall retaliate against or harm any faculty member for:
(a) Disclosing or reporting concerns about any alleged violation of law,
regulatory policy, or ethical standard or any other alleged act of impropriety related
to academic, administrative, or operational matters at the institution, including but
not limited to reporting concerns to any supervisor, institutional official, state or
federal agency, legislator, law enforcement officer, or the public about waste, fraud,
abuse, misconduct, or threats to public health, safety, or institutional integrity.
(b) Exercising academic freedom, including but not limited to teaching
topics that some may consider controversial, conducting research, and publishing
findings.
Page 2 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1749 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 1008
(c) Exercising free speech during student instruction consistent with his
academic field and the subject matter of the course.
(d) Exercising free speech outside the scope of student instruction, including
extramural free speech involving public appearances, publications, and other
expression on topics outside his academic field.
(2) A faculty member is not required to give prior notice to the institution
relative to any of the actions provided for in Subparagraphs (1)(a) through (c) of this
Subsection in order for the protection provided in this Section against being
retaliated against or harmed to apply.
C. Any institution that, or individual who, violates the provisions of
Paragraph (B)(1) of this Section shall be subject to:
(1) Civil penalties of not less than ten thousand dollars and not more than
one hundred thousand dollars per violation.
(2) Injunctive relief to prevent further violations.
(3) Referral to the attorney general or district attorney for potential criminal
prosecution under applicable laws, including but not limited to malfeasance in office
as provided in R.S. 14:134 et seq.
D.(1) Any institution that violates the provisions of Paragraph (B)(1) of this
Section shall be liable for all harm caused to the faculty member, including but not
limited to:
(a) Financial harm, including but not limited to lost wages, benefits, or
opportunities.
(b) Professional harm, including but not limited to damage to reputation,
career advancement, or research opportunities.
(c) Emotional harm, including but not limited to distress, anxiety, or mental
anguish.
(2) An aggrieved faculty member may bring a civil action in a court of
competent jurisdiction within two years of the violation of Paragraph (B)(1) of this
Section. Remedies shall include:
Page 3 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1749 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 1008
(a) Reinstatement, back pay, and restoration of benefits or tenure status if the
faculty member proves by a preponderance of the evidence that an adverse action
against him was retaliation for conduct provided for in Paragraph (B)(1) of this
Section.
(b) Compensatory damages, including treble damages for willful violations.
(c) Reasonable attorney fees and court costs.
(d) Punitive damages of up to five hundred thousand dollars for egregious
or repeated violations.
(3) In accordance with Article X, Section 10(B) of the Constitution of
Louisiana, an institution shall not be entitled to sovereign immunity for violations
of Paragraph (B)(1) of this Section.
E. Nothing in this Part shall be construed to do either of the following:
(1) Limit or restrict the authority of an institution to make legitimate,
merit-based personnel decisions, including the granting or denial of tenure,
promotion, or any other employment action.
(2) Prohibit an institution from denying tenure, promotion, or any other
benefit to a faculty member who fails to satisfy established, codified performance
standards, rubrics, teaching effectiveness criteria, research expectations, service
requirements, or other legitimate academic or institutional criteria, as long as such
decision is not made in retaliation for conduct provided for in Paragraph (B)(1) of
this Section.
F. The Board of Regents shall adopt a uniform policy for the implementation
of this Section, including procedures for confidential reporting and independent
investigations, to which each institution shall adhere.
G. Each institution shall submit a written report to the legislature by March
first annually relative to any complaints it receives pertaining to violations of
Paragraph (B)(1) of this Section and action taken to resolve such complaints.
Section 2. The provisions of R.S. 17:3399.51 as enacted by Section 1 of this Act
shall be applied retroactively to January 1, 2025, as well as prospectively.
Page 4 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1749 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 1008
Section 3. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.